Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-225
Town; failure to organize; officers; how appointed.

In case any town in any county wherein township organization may be adopted, shall refuse or neglect to organize and elect town officers at the time fixed by law, it shall be the duty of the county board, upon the affidavit of any freeholder resident of said town, filed in the office of the county clerk, setting forth the facts, to proceed at any regular or special meeting of the board and appoint necessary town officers for such town, and the persons so appointed shall hold their respective offices until others are chosen or appointed in their places, and shall have the same power and be subject to the same duties and penalties as if they had been duly chosen by the electors of the town.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 23, p. 139;

R.S.1913, § 1009;

C.S.1922, § 911;

C.S.1929, § 26-225;

R.S.1943, § 23-225.